Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.065

Notice of hearing generally.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 11.130.195, 11.130.220, 11.130.275, 11.130.370, and 11.130.600, if notice of a hearing under this chapter is required, the movant shall give notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing to the person to be notified unless otherwise ordered by the court for good cause. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, notice must be given in compliance with the local superior court's rule of civil procedure at least fourteen days before the hearing.

(2) Proof of notice of a hearing under this chapter must be made before or at the hearing and filed in the proceeding.

(3) Notice of a hearing under this chapter must be in at least sixteen-point font, in plain language, and, to the extent feasible, in a language in which the person to be notified is proficient.

[ 2019 c 437 s 113.]